Maryland, session 2026, HB0562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–201.
(a) In this subtitle, except as otherwise provided, the following words have the
meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0562*

HOUSE BILL 562
(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, “inflation adjustment”
means a percentage, rounded to the nearest two decimal places, that is the lesser of:
(i) The increase in the implicit price deflator for State and local
government expenditures for the second prior fiscal year;
(ii) The Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the
Washington Metropolitan Area, or any successor index, for the second prior fiscal year; or
(iii) 5%.
(2) If there is no increase in the implicit price deflator for State and local
government expenditures for the second prior fiscal year or in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers for the Washington Metropolitan Area, or any successor index,
for the second prior fiscal year, then “inflation adjustment” means 0%.
5–235.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to subsection (o) of this section and beginning in fiscal
year 2023, the county governing body shall levy and appropriate an annual tax sufficient
to provide an amount of revenue for elementary and secondary public education purposes
equal to the local share of major education aid as adjusted under § 5–239 of this subtitle.
(ii) For the purposes of calculating the local share of major education
aid and regardless of the source of the funds, all funds that a county board, including the
Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners, is authorized to expend for schools may be
considered as levied by the county council, board of county commissioners, or the Mayor
and City Council of Baltimore except for:
1. State appropriations;
2. Federal education aid payments; and
3. The amount of the expenditure authorized for debt service
and capital outlay.
(2) Subject to subsection (o) of this section and except as provided in
subsection (a–1) of this section, the county governing body shall appropriate local funds to
the school operating budget in an amount no less than the product, INCREASED BY THE
INFLATION ADJUSTMENT, of the county’s enrollment count for the current fiscal year and
the local appropriation on a per pupil basis for the prior fiscal year using enrollment count.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.